dev/apertium-en-de/apertium-en-de.de.dix
<?xml version="1.0" encoding="UTF-8"?>
<dictionary>
  <alphabet>ABCDEFGHIJKLMNOPQRSTUVWXYZabcdefghijklmnopqrstuvwxyzÀÁÂÄÇÈÉÊËÌÍÎÏÑÒÓÔÖÙÚÛÜàáâäçèéêëìíîïñòóôöùúûüß</alphabet>

  <sdefs>
    <sdef n="apos"      c="apostrophe"/>
    <sdef n="cm"        c="comma"/>
    <sdef n="guio"      c="hyphen"/>
    <sdef n="lpar"      c="left parenthesis"/>
    <sdef n="rpar"      c="right parenthesis"/>
    <sdef n="sent"      c="end of sentence"/>
    <sdef n="lquest"    c="left question mark"/>
    <sdef n="num"       c="number"/>
    <sdef n="subj"      c="subject"/>
    <sdef n="obj"       c="object"/>
    <sdef n="dobj"      c="direct object"/>
    <sdef n="iobj"      c="indirect object"/>
    <sdef n="prn"       c="pronoun"/>
    <sdef n="det"       c="determiner"/>
    <sdef n="ind"       c="indefinite"/>
    <sdef n="def"       c="definite"/>
    <sdef n="n"         c="noun"/>
    <sdef n="np"        c="proper noun"/>
    <sdef n="f"         c="feminine"/>
    <sdef n="m"         c="masculine"/>
    <sdef n="nt"        c="neuter"/>
    <sdef n="mf"        c="masculine/feminine"/>
    <sdef n="mfn"       c="masculine/feminine/neuter"/>
    <sdef n="sg"        c="singular"/>
    <sdef n="pl"        c="plural"/>
    <sdef n="sp"        c="singular/plural"/>
    <sdef n="unc"       c="uncountable"/>
    <sdef n="loc"       c="location (not locative)"/>
    <sdef n="cnjcoo"    c="co-ordinating conjunction"/>
    <sdef n="cnjsub"    c="subordinating conjunction"/>
    <sdef n="pr"        c="preposition"/>
    <sdef n="adv"       c="adverb"/>
    <sdef n="adj"       c="adjective"/>
    <sdef n="sint"      c="synthetic (adjective)"/>
    <sdef n="comp"      c="comparative"/>
    <sdef n="sup"       c="superlative"/>
    <sdef n="nom"       c="nominative"/>
    <sdef n="acc"       c="accusative"/>
    <sdef n="dat"       c="dative"/>
    <sdef n="gen"       c="genitive"/>
    <sdef n="vblex"     c="all other verbs"/>
    <sdef n="vbser"     c="the verb 'to be'"/>
    <sdef n="vbhaver"   c="the verb 'to have'"/>
    <sdef n="vbdo"      c="the verb 'to do'"/>
    <sdef n="vbmod"     c="modal verbs"/>
    <sdef n="vaux"      c="auxiliary verbs"/>
    <sdef n="p1"        c="first person"/>
    <sdef n="p2"        c="second person"/>
    <sdef n="p3"        c="third person"/>
    <sdef n="pri"       c="present indicative"/>
    <sdef n="pii"       c="imperfect indicative"/>
    <sdef n="past"      c="past tense (preterite)"/>
    <sdef n="inf"       c="infinitive"/>
    <sdef n="pp"        c="past participle"/>
    <sdef n="pprs"      c="present participle"/>
    <sdef n="imp"       c="imperative"/>
    <sdef n="prs"       c="Present subjunctive"/>
    <sdef n="pis"       c="Imperfect subjunctive"/>
    <sdef n="cog"       c="cognomen (family name)"/>
    <sdef n="ant"       c="anthroponym (first name)"/>
    <sdef n="pos"       c="possessive (pronoun)"/>
    <sdef n="dem"       c="demonstrative (pronoun)"/>
    <sdef n="abbr"      c="abbreviation"/>
    <sdef n="ij"        c="interjection"/>
    <sdef n="preadv"    c="Pre-adverb"/>
    <sdef n="frm"       c="formal"/>
    <sdef n="st"        c="strong"/>
    <sdef n="sw"        c="weak"/>
    <sdef n="mix"       c="mixed"/>
    <sdef n="ord"       c="Ordinal"/>
    <sdef n="sep"       c="Seperable verb"/>
    <sdef n="qnt"       c="Quantifier"/>
    <sdef n="ref"       c="Reflexive"/>
    <sdef n="cnjadv"    c="Adverbial conjunction"/>
    <sdef n="itg"       c="Interrogative"/>

  </sdefs>

  <pardefs>

    <pardef n="guionet">
      <e>       <p><l>-</l>         <r>-<s n="guio"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="coma">
      <e>       <p><l>,</l>         <r>,<s n="cm"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="cometa">
      <e>       <p><l>'</l>         <r>'<s n="apos"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="numeros">
      <e>       <re>[0-9]+([.,][0-9]+)?</re><p><l></l><r><s n="num"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="separa">
      <e>       <re>[.\?;:!]</re><p><l></l><r><s n="sent"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="separ">
      <e>       <re>[¿¡]</re><p><l></l><r><s n="lquest"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="paresq">
      <e>       <re>[\(\[]</re><p><l></l><r><s n="lpar"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="pardret">
      <e>       <re>[\)\]]</re><p><l></l><r><s n="rpar"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <!-- Orthography -->

    <pardef n="ae_ä">
      <e>       <p><l>ä</l>         <r>ä</r></p></e>
      <e r="LR"><p><l>ae</l>        <r>ä</r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="oe_ö">
      <e>       <p><l>ö</l>         <r>ö</r></p></e>
      <e r="LR"><p><l>oe</l>        <r>ö</r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="ue_ü">
      <e>       <p><l>ü</l>         <r>ü</r></p></e>
      <e r="LR"><p><l>ue</l>        <r>ü</r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="ss_ß">
      <e>       <p><l>ß</l>         <r>ß</r></p></e>
      <e r="LR"><p><l>ss</l>        <r>ß</r></p></e>
    </pardef>


    <!-- Endungen Adjektivdeklination (stark/schwach/gemischt) -->

    <e>                      <par n="separa"/></e>
    <e>                      <par n="numeros"/></e>
    <e>                      <par n="coma"/></e>
    <e>                      <par n="cometa"/></e>
    <e>                      <par n="paresq"/></e>
    <e>                      <par n="pardret"/></e>
    <e>                      <par n="guionet"/></e>
